Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1772.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) The sale at retail or use of fruit seeds, vegetable seeds, fruit plants, vegetable plants, fruit trees or other seeds, plants or trees that can be grown for human consumption.12345678910111213141516171819202122 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1772PN2180 - 2 - 1